Idaho, session 2026, H0604.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-8316, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8316. REQUIREMENT FOR PSYCHOSEXUAL EVALUATIONS UPON CONVIC-
TION. If ordered by the court, an offender convicted of any offense Any
person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation listed in sec-
tion 18-8304, Idaho Code, may submit to an evaluation to be completed and
submitted to the court in the form of a written report shall undergo, at the
person's own expense, a psychosexual evaluation from a certified evaluator
as defined in section 18-8303, Idaho Code, for the court's consideration
prior to sentencing and incarceration or release on probation. The court
shall select the certified evaluator from a central roster of evaluators
compiled by the sexual offender management board. A certified evaluator
performing such an evaluation shall be disqualified from providing any
treatment ordered as a condition of any sentence, unless waived by the court.
An evaluation conducted pursuant to this section shall be done in accordance
with the standards established by the board pursuant to section 18-8314,
Idaho Code. If the defendant has not made a good faith effort to provide the
completed copy of the evaluation to the court, the court may consider the
failure of the defendant to provide the evaluation as an aggravating circum-
stance in determining an appropriate sentence.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-8318, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8318. OFFENDER REQUIRED TO PAY FOR PSYCHOSEXUAL EVALUATION. The
offender shall be required to pay for the cost of the psychosexual eval-
uations performed under this chapter, unless the offender demonstrates
indigency. In such case, the psychosexual evaluation performed pursuant to
section 18-8316, Idaho Code, shall be paid for by the county. As a condi-
tion of sentence, indigent offenders for whom the county has paid the cost
of evaluation performed pursuant to section 18-8316, Idaho Code, shall be
required to repay the county for the cost. Nothing in this section shall
preclude the use of funds authorized for court-ordered counseling or treat-


ment pursuant to the provisions of this section for indigent defendants, as
provided by law. In the event that funding is provided for or on behalf of the
defendant by a governmental entity, the defendant shall be ordered to make
restitution to such governmental entity in accordance with the restitution
procedure for crime victims, as provided in chapter 53, title 19, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.